Massachusetts, session 194th, H458.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 237. (a) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following 
meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
“Cosmetic”, means any article, or its components, intended to be rubbed, poured, 
sprinkled, or sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to, the human body, or any part of 
the human body, for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance.  
“Ingredient”, has the same meaning as that term is defined in 21 CFR section 700.3(e) 
and does not include any incidental ingredient as defined in 21 CFR section 701.3(l).  

of 2 9  “Professional” means a person that has been granted a license by the board of registration 
of cosmetology and barbering to practice in the field of cosmetology, nail care, hairdressing, 
barbering, or aesthetics. 
“Professional cosmetic” means a cosmetic that is intended or marketed to be used only by 
a professional on account of a specific ingredient, increased concentration of an ingredient, or 
other quality that requires safe handling, or is otherwise used by a professional. 
(b) A professional cosmetic manufactured on or after July 1, 2026, for sale in the 
commonwealth shall have a label affixed on the container that satisfies all of the labeling 
requirements for any other cosmetic pursuant to the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 
U.S.C. Sec. 301, et seq., and the federal Fair Packaging and Labeling Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1451, 
et seq.